Massachusetts, session 194th, H1963.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 31 of chapter 208 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2010
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting, in line 2, after the word “otherwise” the
following 3 definitions:-
“Deployment” the temporary transfer of a member of the Armed forces in active-duty
status in support of combat or some other military operation.
“Mobilization” the transfer of a member of the National Guard or Military Reserve to
extended active-duty status, but does not include National Guard or Military Reserve annual
training.
“Temporary duty” the transfer of a service member from one military base to a different
location, usually another base, for a limited period of time to accomplish training or to assist in
the performance of a noncombat mission.
of 3

SECTION 2. Said section 31 of said chapter 208 of the General Laws, as appearing in the
2010 Official Edition, is hereby further amended by inserting the following paragraphs:-
A party’s absence, relocation, or failure to comply with custody and visitation orders
shall not be considered in determining the modification of a custody or visitation order if the
reason for the absence, relocation, or failure to comply is the party’s activation to military duty
or temporary duty, mobilization in support of combat or other military operation, or military
deployment out of state.
If a party with sole or joint physical custody or visitation receives temporary duty,
deployment, or mobilization orders from the military that require the party to move a substantial
distance from his or her residence or otherwise has a material effect on the ability of the party to
exercise custody or visitation rights, the court may do either of the following:
1) Issue a temporary custody or visitation order for the period extending from the date of
the party’s departure to the date of his or her return. This temporary custody or visitation order
shall terminate upon the return of the party, at which time the prior custody or visitation order
shall return to effect.
2) Issue an order delegating all or part of the party’s visitation rights to a family member
or step-parent with whom the child has a close relationship, for the purpose of ensuring that the
child’s contact with the party is frequent and continued while the party is deployed, mobilized, or
on temporary duty, if the court finds that delegating visitation rights is in the best interest of the
child.
of 3

If a party’s deployment, mobilization, or temporary duty will have a material effect on his
or her ability, or anticipated ability to appear in person at a regularly scheduled hearing, the court
shall do either of the following:
1) Upon motion of the party, hold an expedited hearing to determine custody and
visitation issues prior to the departure of the party.
2) Upon motion of the party, allow the party to present testimony and evidence by
electronic means, including, but not limited to, telephone, video teleconferencing, or the internet.
of 3